Nebraska, session 109, LB1231.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1231 LB1231
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-2,237, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-2,237 (1) There is hereby created the Animal Damage Control Cash
Fund. Such fund shall be administered by the Department of Agriculture.
The fund shall consist of funds received from any source to carry out the
animal damage control program pursuant to section 81-2,236. Any money in
the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate twenty-six
thousand dollars for fiscal year 2026-27 from the Animal Damage Control
Cash Fund to the Department of Agriculture to carry out the animal damage
control program pursuant to section 81-2,236.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1213.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1213.03 (1) The Panhandle Improvement Project Cash Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Economic
Development. The fund shall consist of funds transferred by the
Legislature. Transfers may be made from the Panhandle Improvement Project
Cash Fund to the Animal Damage Control Cash Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be used for grants for the following purposes:
(a) A grant to a county in the third congressional district that
owns and operates the county fairgrounds for renovation to the
fairgrounds. A grant under this subdivision shall be limited to nine
hundred ninety-five thousand dollars; and
(b) A grant to a village with a population of less than ten persons
for renovation to a community facility that serves the surrounding rural
area. A grant under this subdivision shall be limited to five thousand
-2-

LB1231 LB1231
2026 2026
dollars.
(3) The Department of Economic Development shall develop criteria
for grant applications pursuant to this section.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated money that
remains in the Panhandle Improvement Project Cash Fund to the Animal
Damage Control Cash Fund as soon as administratively practicable on or
after July 31, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-2,237 and 81-1213.03, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-